Missouri, session 2026, HB3451.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 210, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 210.141, to read as follows:
210.141. 1. If an assessment is initiated for alleged child abuse or neglect, any
face-to-face interview with a child and any adult associated with the assessment by the
department of social services shall be recorded, either by audio or video medium, unless
the recording equipment malfunctions or circumstances occur that could not have been
reasonably foreseen by the director of the department of social services that would
prevent the recording of the interview.
2. Only applications or software approved by the department of social services
shall be used to generate any audio or video recording, and any such recording shall be
securely stored.
3. Any person who is charged with an offense alleging child abuse or neglect
shall not be able to sustain a motion or have standing to bring a claim objecting to any
failure, in whole or in part, by the department of social services to comply with the
requirements of this section. Any such failure by the department to comply with such
requirements shall not solely constitute grounds to preclude statements made by a child
during that interview that would otherwise be admissible in a criminal or civil
proceeding.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3451 2
4. Any recording obtained under this section shall be retained and stored for no
less than five years. Any retention system shall securely manage the storage and
distribution of the recordings.
5. A copy of any recording under this section shall be issued only to those
investigating an allegation or prosecuting an offense relating to an allegation of child
abuse or neglect and upon request by a caregiver or guardian in connection with a
judicial proceeding unless the court orders otherwise.
✔